Idaho, session 2025, S1196.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Idaho Commission for Libraries the fol-
lowing amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes
from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $42,400 $42,400
Federal Grant
Fund $1,231,000 0 1,231,000
TOTAL $1,231,000 $42,400 $1,273,400
SECTION 2. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY -- LIBRARY PROJECTS. There is
hereby reappropriated to the Idaho Commission for Libraries any unexpended
and unencumbered balance appropriated or reappropriated to the Idaho Com-
mission for Libraries from the ARPA Capital Projects Fund for fiscal year
2025, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures related to library capital
projects for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office
of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount by fund,
expense class, and program, with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division
of the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the reappropriation
authorized herein.
SECTION 3. USE OF APPROPRIATED FUNDS. State-appropriated funds shall
not be utilized to support diversity, equity, inclusion, or social justice
ideology as part of any activities, clubs, events, or organizations. Each
library that receives state-appropriated funds shall submit a written re-
port of its expenditures related to these activities to the Joint Finance-


Appropriations Committee and the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the
Legislative Services Office no later than December 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. PROVIDING FOR A REPORT ON STATUTORY ADHERENCE. The Idaho
Commission for Libraries shall designate an existing employee to confirm by
means of affidavit that state libraries adhere to Section 18-1517B, Idaho
Code. The designated employee shall also coordinate with the Department
of Education to confirm by means of affidavit that schools libraries ad-
here to Sections 18-1517B and 33-137, Idaho Code. The Idaho Commission for
Libraries shall provide a report to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Com-
mittee no later than December 1, 2025, including the commission's findings.
The report and information contained therein shall be determined by the Bud-
get and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 5. FEDERAL FUNDING RESTRICTIONS. Pursuant to Section
67-3511(2), Idaho Code, legislative appropriations shall not be transferred
from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
Appropriations made pursuant to this act contingent on anticipated federal
funding, grants, or programs shall not be supplanted by state funds in the
event of any reduction or elimination of such federal support without leg-
islative approval. The agency receiving the appropriation shall take all
necessary actions to ensure that the state is not obligated to replace lost
federal funds. Pursuant to Section 67-1917, Idaho Code, the agency will
submit an inventory of federal funds utilized by the agency. State funds ap-
propriated to satisfy match requirements for federal funds shall be reverted
to the maximum extent possible if federal funds requiring match are reduced
or eliminated. The agency shall promptly notify the Budget and Policy Anal-
ysis Division of the Legislative Services Office of any significant changes
to related federal funding, grants, or programs.
SECTION 6. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.